Louisiana, session 2026, HB961.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1717 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1717. Exemption for property of a person who is at least sixty-five years of age or
older or a surviving spouse; eligibility for certain trusts
A trust shall be eligible for the ad valorem tax exemption established
pursuant to Article VII, Section 21(P) of the Constitution of Louisiana, which
provides an exemption for a person who is at least sixty-five years of age or older or
a surviving spouse of the owner, if all of the following apply:
(1) The settlor of the trust meets the conditions for eligibility established
pursuant to Article VII, Section 21(P) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2) The settlor of the trust was the immediate prior owner of the homestead.
(3) The naked ownership of the homestead was transferred to the trust.
(4) The settlor retained a usufruct on the homestead.
(5) The settlor continues to occupy the homestead.
(6) The settlor would be eligible for the exemption established pursuant to
Article VII, Section 21(P) of the Constitution of Louisiana had he retained the naked
ownership of the homestead.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 961 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028, but only if the
proposed amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 514 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.